Utah statutes.
35A-9-305.   Annual report by the commission.

(1)  The commission shall submit, before November 1, an annual written report to:

(a)  the governor;

(b)  the Legislative Management Committee;

(c)  the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee;

(d)  the Education Interim Committee;

(e)  the Health and Human Services Interim Committee;

(f)  the Judiciary Interim Committee; and

(g)  the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee.

(2)  The report described in Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  include the five and 10-year plans described in Subsection 35A-9-303(2)(e);

(b)  describe how the commission fulfilled its statutory purposes and duties during the year;

(c)  describe policies, procedures, and programs that have been implemented or modified to help break the cycle of poverty and end welfare dependency for children in the state affected by intergenerational poverty; and

(d)  contain recommendations on how the state should act to address issues relating to breaking the cycle of poverty and ending welfare dependency for children in the state affected by intergenerational poverty.



Enacted by Chapter 59, 2013 General Session

